Washington statutes.
RCW 18.71.080

License renewal—Human trafficking information—Continuing education requirement—Failure to renew, procedure.

(1)(a) Every person licensed to practice medicine in this state shall pay licensing fees and renew his or her license in accordance with administrative procedures and administrative requirements adopted as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

(b) The commission shall request licensees to submit information about their current professional practice at the time of license renewal and licensees must provide the information requested. This information may include practice setting, medical specialty, board certification, or other relevant data determined by the commission.

(c) A physician who resides and practices in Washington and obtains or renews a retired active license shall be exempt from licensing fees imposed under this section. The commission may establish rules governing mandatory continuing education requirements which shall be met by physicians applying for renewal of licenses. The rules shall provide that mandatory continuing education requirements may be met in part by physicians showing evidence of the completion of approved activities relating to professional liability risk management. The number of hours of continuing education for a physician holding a retired active license shall not exceed fifty hours per year.

(2) The office of crime victims advocacy shall supply the commission with information on methods of recognizing victims of human trafficking, what services are available for these victims, and where to report potential trafficking situations. The information supplied must be culturally sensitive and must include information relating to minor victims. The commission shall disseminate this information to licensees by: Providing the information on the commission's website; including the information in newsletters; holding trainings at meetings attended by organization members; or another distribution method determined by the commission. The commission shall report to the office of crime victims advocacy on the method or methods it uses to distribute information under this subsection.

(3) The commission, in its sole discretion, may permit an applicant who has not renewed his or her license to be licensed without examination if it is satisfied that such applicant meets all the requirements for licensure in this state, and is competent to engage in the practice of medicine.

[ 2015 c 252 s 8; 2011 c 178 s 1. Prior: 2009 c 492 s 5; 2009 c 403 s 2; 1996 c 191 s 52; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 312; prior: 1991 c 195 s 1; 1991 c 3 s 163; 1985 c 322 s 4; prior: 1979 c 158 ss 53, 54, 55; 1975 1st ex.s. c 171 s 11; 1971 ex.s. c 266 s 12; 1955 c 202 s 36; prior: 1941 c 166 s 1, part; 1913 c 82 s 1, part; 1909 c 192 s 7, part; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 10010-1, part.]

NOTES:

Intent—2015 c 252: See note following RCW 70.112.010.

Finding—Intent—2009 c 403: "The legislature finds that increasing the number of retired physicians who provide volunteer health care services is a cost-effective way to improve access to health care for many citizens of this state. Physicians holding a retired active license must currently meet many of the same requirements as physicians in active practice, including at least fifty hours of continuing education a year, despite the fact that retired active physicians may only practice a maximum of ninety days a year, are limited to providing primary care services, and are limited to providing such services only in community clinics that are operated by public or private tax-exempt corporations. This presents both financial and practical barriers for retired physicians who wish to provide health care services on a volunteer basis, barriers that are not as stringent in other states that provide similar licenses for retired physicians. It is therefore the intent of the legislature to ease some of these barriers in a manner that does not adversely affect public safety." [ 2009 c 403 s 1.]

Severability—Headings and captions not law—Effective date—1994 sp.s. c 9: See RCW 18.79.900 through 18.79.902.